Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2676] CUSIP identification numbers.
The board may provide that CUSIP identification numbers shall be printed on
revenue bonds issued under this subpart. If numbers are printed on any such
revenue bonds:

(1) No number shall constitute a part of the contract
evidenced by the particular revenue bond upon which it is printed; and

(2) No liability shall attach to the board or any
officer or agent thereof or the State or any officer thereof, including any
fiscal agent, paying agent, or registrar for revenue bonds, by reason of the
numbers or any use made thereof, including any use thereof made by the board or
any officer or agent thereof, the State, any officer or agent thereof, or by
reason of any inaccuracy, error, or omission.

The board may require that all costs of
obtaining and printing the CUSIP identification numbers shall be paid by the
purchaser of the revenue bonds. [L 2007, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next